Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2159.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43DECOMMISSIONING AND REPURPOSING OF WAREHOUSESSec.4301. Definitions.4302. Decommissioning requirements in decommissioning plan.4303. Repurposing requirements in repurposing plan.4304. Financial assurance requirements in decommissioning plan.4305. Form and content of repurposing plan.4306. Form and content of decommissioning plan.4307. Applicability.§ 4301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter 12345678910111213141516171819 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Ceased operation." T he point at which a warehouse permanently discontinues its primary activities and no longer serves its warehousing or logistics function."Commencement of construction." T he date on which a property owner issues a full notice to proceed to a construction contractor for the initiation of warehouse construction activities."Decommissioning plan." A document submitted to the department that describes the process for decommissioning a warehouse and specifies the amount, form and timing of the financial assurance required under this chapter."Department." T he Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Professional engineer." A s defined in section 2(e) of the act of May 23, 1945 (P.L.913, No.367), known as the Engineer, Land Surveyor and Geologist Registration Law."Property owner." An individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust or other legal entity that holds legal title to the parcel or parcels of property on which a warehouse subject to this chapter is or will be constructed."Repurposing plan." A document submitted to the department that describes the proposed reuse of a warehouse that has ceased operation and includes the intended new use, project schedule, municipal approvals and any future decommissioning obligations."Warehouse." A large facility used for the organized storage, retrieval and movement of goods, materials, merchandise or other items.§ 4302. D ecommissioning requirements in decommissioning plan. 20260HB2159PN2793 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A decommissioning plan executed on or after the effective date of this section shall include a provision stating that the property owner is responsible for decommissioning the warehouse in accordance with this chapter no later than 18 months after the warehouse has ceased operation unless the property owner is actively pursuing a repurposing plan approved by the department. The requirement under this section shall apply notwithstanding the occurrence of a force majeure or similar event.§ 4303. R epurposing requirements in repurposing plan. A property owner that seeks to implement a repurposing plan on or after the effective date of this section shall submit the repurposing plan to the department and obtain approval from the department no later than 18 months after the warehouse has ceased operation. Upon approval of the plan, the department shall establish a binding schedule for commencement and completion of the repurposing project. The department may modify the schedule upon written request by the property owner and a showing of good cause.§ 4304. Financial assurance requirements in decommissioning plan.(a) Proof of financial assurance.--A property owner that applies for a building permit, land development permit or zoning approval for a warehouse under the Uniform Construction Code, a State regulation or local ordinance on or after the effective date of this subsection shall submit to the department a decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance. The financial assurance shall conform to the requirements of this chapter and shall secure the performance of the property owner's obligation to decommission the warehouse. If the property owner fails to fulfill the obligation to decommission the warehouse, 20260HB2159PN2793 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the financial assurance shall be payable to the department.(b) Amount of financial assurance.--T he amount of financial assurance shall be equal to the estimated cost to decommission the warehouse. The amount of financial assurance shall be calculated and updated every five years by a third-party professional engineer retained by the property owner from a list of professional engineers compiled by the department and published on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Delivery.--T he property owner shall deliver the decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance to the department as follows:(1) No later than 30 days before commencement of construction of the warehouse, the property owner shall submit the decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance to the department in an amount equal to 10% of the estimated cost of decommissioning as determined by a third-party professional engineer.(2) On or before the fifth anniversary of the commencement of construction of the warehouse, the property owner shall submit an updated decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance to the department in an amount equal to 30% of the estimated cost of decommissioning as determined by a third-party professional engineer.(3) On or before the 10th anniversary of the commencement of construction of the warehouse, the property owner shall submit an updated decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance to the department in an amount equal to 50% of the estimated cost of decommissioning as determined by a third-party professional engineer.20260HB2159PN2793 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) On or before the 15th anniversary of the commencement of construction of the warehouse, the property owner shall submit an updated decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance to the department in an amount equal to 75% of the estimated cost of decommissioning as determined by a third-party professional engineer.(5) On or before the 20th anniversary of the commencement of construction of the warehouse, the property owner shall submit an updated decommissioning plan and proof of financial assurance to the department in an amount equal to 100% of the estimated cost of decommissioning as determined by a third-party professional engineer.(d) Forms of financial assurance.--A ny of the following shall constitute an acceptable form of financial assurance:(1) An escrow account.(2) A certificate of deposit or an automatically renewable, irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution chartered or authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and regulated and examined by a Federal agency or the Commonwealth.(3) A bond executed by the property owner and a corporate surety licensed to do business in this Commonwealth.(4) A negotiable bond issued by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or a municipality within this Commonwealth.(e) Transferability.--A decommissioning plan and the associated financial assurance may not be separated from the warehouse through a change in property ownership. The new property owner shall submit proof of financial assurance in accordance with subsection (a). The prior property owner may not 20260HB2159PN2793 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 release or revoke the existing financial assurance until the new property owner's proof of financial assurance is filed with the department.(f) Repurposing exception.--If the property owner submits, and the department approves, a repurposing plan in accordance with section 4305 (relating to form and content of repurposing plan), the department may suspend or release the financial assurance requirements under this section. The department shall ensure that any future decommissioning obligations are addressed in the approved repurposing plan.§ 4305. Form and content of repurposing plan.(a) Development of form.--W ithin 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall, by regulation and in consultation with the industrial development and warehouse industry, develop a final standard form for the submission of repurposing plans under this chapter.(b) Contents.--T he final standard form developed under subsection (a) shall require that the property owner's repurposing plan include all of the following:(1) A letter of written approval from the governing body of the municipality in which the repurposing project is proposed. If municipal approval is not provided, the repurposing plan shall be invalid.(2) A description of the proposed repurposed use and its expected operational timeline.(3) A proposed schedule for commencement and completion of the repurposing project, subject to approval and modification by the department under section 4303 (relating to repurposing requirements in repurposing plan).(4) A plan for future decommissioning in the event that 20260HB2159PN2793 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the repurposed use ceases operation.(5) A description of any modifications to existing financial assurance requirements.(6) Any other information the department deems necessary to evaluate the feasibility and public benefit of the repurposing plan.§ 4306. F orm and content of decommissioning plan. (a) Development of form.--W ithin 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall, by regulation and in consultation with the industrial development and warehouse industry, develop a final standard form for the submission of decommissioning plans and financial assurance under this chapter.(b) Contents.--The f inal standard form developed under subsection (a) shall require that the property owner's decommissioning plan include all of the following:(1) The removal of all warehouse structures, concrete slabs, fencing and foundations.(2) The removal of all graveled areas and parking lots.(3) The disconnection of all utility service lines and removal of all aboveground and underground utility infrastructure. The property owner shall not be required to remove equipment or materials that a public utility requires to remain on site.(4) The restoration of the property to a condition reasonably similar to its condition before commencement of construction.(5) The financial assurance required under section 4304 (relating to financial assurance requirements in decommissioning plan).20260HB2159PN2793 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4307. A pplicability. This chapter shall not apply to a warehouse with a square footage less than or equal to 5,000 square feet.Section 2. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following provisions shall take effect immediately:The addition of 27 Pa.C.S. §§ 4305 and 4306.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 180 days.20260HB2159PN2793 - 8 - 12345678910